District of Columbia statutes.
40-305.01

Wharves and lots.

Any person who shall furnish materials or labor in filling up any lot or in constructing any wharf thereon, or dredging the channel of the river in front of any wharf, under any contract with the owner, shall be entitled to a lien for the value of such work or materials on said lot and wharf upon the same conditions and to be enforced in the same manner as in the case of work done in the erection of buildings, as provided in § 40-303.08.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1388, ch. 854, § 1259
1973 Ed., § 38-123.
1981 Ed., § 38-123.